fi: Highback-tyyppi: Epäsymmetrinen; Freestyle; Matalaprofiilinen; Minimalistinen; Lyhyt; Splitboard-kohtainen; Symmetrinen; Korkea; Siivellinen; Muu
ja: ハイバックスタイル: アシンメトリー; フリースタイル; ロープロファイル; ミニマリスト; ショート; スプリットボード専用; シンメトリー; トール; ウィング付き; その他
el: Στυλ Highback: Ασύμμετρο; Freestyle; Χαμηλού προφίλ; Μινιμαλιστικό; Κοντό; Ειδικά για splitboard; Συμμετρικό; Ψηλό; Με φτερά; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stil cu spătar înalt: Asimetric; Freestyle; Profil redus; Minimalist; Scurt; Specific pentru splitboard; Simetric; Înalt; Cu aripi; Altele
pl: Styl highbacku: Asymetryczna; Freestyle; Niski profil; Minimalistyczna; Krótka; Do splitboardów; Symetryczna; Wysoka; Ze skrzydłami; Inny
de: Stil des Highbacks: Asymmetrisch; Freestyle; Niedriges Profil; Minimalistisch; Kurz; Spezifisch für Splitboards; Symmetrisch; Hoch; Geflügelt; Andere
es: Estilo de respaldo alto: Asimétrico; Estilo libre; Perfil bajo; Minimalista; Corto; Específico para splitboard; Simétrico; Alto; Con aletas; Otro
lt-LT: Aukštos nugarėlės stilius: Asimetriškas; Laisvojo stiliaus („Freestyle“); Žemo profilio; Minimalistinis; Trumpas; Pritaikytas „Splitboard“ snieglentėms; Simetriškas; Aukštas; Sparnuotas; Kita
th: สไตล์พนักพิงสูง: อสมมาตร; ฟรีสไตล์; แบบบาง; มินิมอล; สั้น; เฉพาะสปลิตบอร์ด; สมมาตร; สูง; มีปีก; อื่นๆ
tr: Yüksek sırtlı model: Asimetrik; Serbest stil; Düşük profil; Minimalist; Kısa; Splitboard'a özel; Simetrik; Uzun; Kanatlı; Diğer
zh-CN: 高靠背款式: 不对称; 自由式; 低帮设计; 极简; 短款; 分离板专用; 对称; 高款; 带侧翼; 其他
ru: Тип хайбэка: Асимметричный; Фристайл; Низкий профиль; Минималистичный; Короткий; Для сплитборда; Симметричный; Высокий; С крыльями; Другое
hr-HR: Stil s visokim naslonom: Asimetričan; Freestyle; Niski profil; Minimalistički; Kratak; Specifično za splitboard; Simetričan; Visok; S krilcima; Ostalo
it: Stile con schienale alto: Asimmetrico; Freestyle; Basso profilo; Minimalista; Corto; Specifico per splitboard; Simmetrico; Alto; Con alette; Altro
cs: Styl opěrné patky: Asymetrický; Freestyle; Nízkoprofilový; Minimalistický; Krátký; Určeno pro splitboardy; Symetrický; Vysoký; S bočnicemi (winged); Jiný
pt-BR: Estilo do highback: Assimétrico; Freestyle; Perfil baixo; Minimalista; Curto; Específico para splitboard; Simétrico; Alto; Com asas; Outros
da: Design af rygplade: Asymmetrisk; Freestyle; Lav profil; Minimalistisk; Kort; Specifik til splitboard; Symmetrisk; Høj; Med vinger; Andet
en: Highback style: Asymmetrical; Freestyle; Low profile; Minimalist; Short; Splitboard specific; Symmetrical; Tall; Winged; Other
zh-TW: 高背板樣式: 不對稱; 自由式; 短版; 極簡; 短版; 剖半滑雪板專用; 對稱; 長版; 翼型; 其他
ko: 하이백 스타일: 비대칭; 프리스타일; 로우 프로파일; 미니멀리스트; 쇼트; 스플릿보드 전용; 대칭; 톨; 윙; 기타
nl: Highback stijl: Asymmetrisch; Freestyle; Laag profiel; Minimalistisch; Kort; Specifiek voor splitboard; Symmetrisch; Hoog; Met vleugels; Overig
bg-BG: Стил с високата облегалка: Асиметричен; Свободен стил; Нисък профил; Минималистичен; Къс; Специфичен за сплитборд; Симетричен; Висок; С крила; Други
vi: Kiểu lưng cao: Bất đối xứng; Tự do; Cấu hình thấp; Tối giản; Ngắn; Dành riêng cho ván splitboard; Đối xứng; Cao; Có cánh; Khác
fr: Style de highback: Asymétrique; Freestyle; Profil bas; Minimaliste; Court; Spécifique au splitboard; Symétrique; Grand; À ailettes; Autre
nb: Highback-stil: Asymmetrisk; Freestyle; Lavprofil; Minimalistisk; Kort; Spesifikk for splitboard; Symmetrisk; Høy; Med vinger; Annet
sk-SK: Štýl s vysokým chrbtom: Asymetrický; Freestyle; Nízky profil; Minimalistický; Krátky; Špecifický pre splitboard; Symetrický; Vysoký; Krídlový; Iné
pt-PT: Estilo Highback: Assimétrico; Freestyle; Baixo perfil; Minimalista; Curto; Específico para splitboard; Simétrico; Alto; Com abas; Outro
hu: Highback kialakítása: Aszimmetrikus; Freestyle; Alacsony profilú; Minimalista; Rövid; Kifejezetten splitboardhoz; Szimmetrikus; Magas; Szárnyas; Egyéb
sv: Typ av highback: Asymmetrisk; Freestyle; Låg profil; Minimalistisk; Kort; Specifik för splitboard; Symmetrisk; Hög; Vingförsedd; Annat
sl-SI: Stil hrbtišča: Asimetrično; Prosti slog; Nizki profil; Minimalistično; Kratko; Specifično za splitboard; Simetrično; Visoko; S krilci; Drugo